FOMA_Scripts/fullgerman.lexc
LEXICON NMasc_es_$erSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^er #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^er #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ern #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^er #;


LEXICON NMasc_es_eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_en
Aggressor    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Detektor    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Direktor    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Doktor    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Dorn    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Fakt    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Fratz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Freistaat    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Indikator    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Initiator    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Inspektor    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Leis    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Mast    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Nerv    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Organisator    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Prototyp    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Psalm    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Schmerz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Schoss    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Spatz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Staat    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Steinmetz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Strahl    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Zeh    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Zins    NMasc_es_enSPinf;
Schmerz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;

LEXICON  NMasc_es_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_n_nSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$
Acker    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Apfel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Attentäter    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Bruder    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Grossvater    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Hammer    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Handel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Mantel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Nagel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Sattel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Schnabel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Schwager    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Vater    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Vogel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Zankapfel    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Ziehvater    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Vater    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Schwager    NMasc_s_$SPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$x
Boden    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Bogen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Faden    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Flughafen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Garten    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Graben    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Hafen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Kasten    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Kindergarten    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Kragen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Laden    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Magen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Ofen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Regenbogen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Schaden    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Schrebergarten    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Wagen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;
Wagen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;


LEXICON NMasc_s_0SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^0 #;


LEXICON NMasc_s_eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_n
Bummel    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Coupe    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Konsul    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Muskel    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Pharao    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Stachel    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Vetter    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Zander    NMasc_s_nSPinf;
Muskel    NMasc_s_nSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_nSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_sSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_x
Muni    NMasc_s_xSPinf;
Regen    NMasc_s_xSPinf;
Regen NMasc_s_xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut-0/ien
Adverb    NNeut-0/ienSPinf;
Adverb    NNeut-0/ienSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-0/ienSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^ien #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^ien #;



LEXICON NNeut-a/ata
Klima    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Komma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Paradigma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Schema    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Sperma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Stigma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Trauma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;
Sperma    NNeut-a/ataSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-a/ataSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^ata #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^ata #;

LEXICON NNeut-a/en
Aroma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Dogma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Drama    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Panorama    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Paradigma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Plasma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Prisma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Stigma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Thema    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Trauma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;
Stigma    NNeut-a/enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-a/enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^en #;



LEXICON NNeut-on/a
Lexikon    NNeut-on/aSPinf;
Lexikon NNeut-on/aSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-on/aSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-on^a #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-on^a #;

LEXICON NNeut-s/$sser
Fass    NNeut-s/$sserSPinf;
Schloss    NNeut-s/$sserSPinf;
fass    NNeut-s/$sserSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-s/$sserSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-s+um^sser #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-s+um^sser #;

LEXICON NNeut-um/a
Absurdum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Anabolikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Antibiotikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Charakteristikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Fatum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Kosmetikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Kuriosum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Maximum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Minimum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Optimum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Politikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Praktikum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Psychopharmakon    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Serum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Spektrum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Ultimatum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Vakuum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Visum    NNeut-um/aSPinf;
Fatum NNeut-um/aSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut-um/aSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-um^a #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-um^a #;

LEXICON NNeut-um/enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:-um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:-um^en #;


LEXICON NNeut/PlSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_e
Anbeginn    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Aschermittwoch    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Übermut    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Delphin    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Entscheid    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Fund    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Herold    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Kelt    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Krawall    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Moloch    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Plüsch    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Reim    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Scherz    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Senat    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Stier    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Tod    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Verzicht    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
Zweck    NMasc_es_eSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_n_n
Auszubildende    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Böhme    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Bulle    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Eleve    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Finke    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Fromme    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Geologe    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Götze    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Hinterbliebene    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Junge    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Kollege    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Kunde    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Live    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Mime    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Pommer    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Scherge    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Spitzname    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
Weissrusse    NMasc_n_nSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_s_0
Artikel    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Bügel    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Controller    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Elsässer    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Frachter    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Golfer    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Hügel    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Jänner    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Kiefer    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Krüppel    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Makel    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Musiker    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Parameter    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Premierminister    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Schaffner    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Sprayer    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Trichter    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
Zeller    NMasc_s_0SPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_s_e
Archivar    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Basar    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Charakter    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Dinar    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Feierabend    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Galopp    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Herzog    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Ingenieur    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Juwelier    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Katalog    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Koalitionär    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Kurier    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Möchtegern    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Notar    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Referendar    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Souverän    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Turban    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
Winzling    NMasc_s_eSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_s_en
Diktator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Faktor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Innensenator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Junior    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Katalysator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Kommentator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Konditor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Kurator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Mobilisator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Navigator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Pastor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Professor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Reaktor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Restaurator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Sektor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Simulator    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Typ    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
Zensor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_s_s
Bikini    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Canyon    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Chip    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Coupon    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Dollar    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Finanzier    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Gig    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Highway    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Jargon    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Kart    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Lift    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Moslem    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Paparazzi    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Porno    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Salon    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Spike    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Tommy    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
Yard    NMasc_s_sSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut-um/en
Bakterium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Evangelium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Gymnasium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Innenministerium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Kollegium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Konservatorium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Kuratorium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Medium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Monstrum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Novum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Planetarium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Privilegium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Rechenzentrum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Sanatorium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Spermium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Symposium    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Universum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
Forum    NNeut-um/enSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut/Pl
Bambini    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Cembali    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Epen    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Extras    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Gatts    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Indizien    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Klimate    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Korpora    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Matts    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Mineralien    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Offices    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Partikeln    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Prinzipien    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Reptilien    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Risken    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Shorts    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Stadien    NNeut/PlSPinf;
Violoncelli    NNeut/PlSPinf;
